North Dakota, session 69, SB2253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subdivision to subsection 2 of section 39-06.1-06 of the North Dakota Century
Code is created and enacted as follows:
A violation of section 3 of this Act, a fee of fifty dollars.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 39-06.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-06.1-09. Moving violation defined.
For the purposes of sections 39-06.1-06 and 39-06.1-13, a "moving violation" means a violation of
section 39-04-11, 39-04-22, subsection 1 of section 39-04-37, section 39-04-55, 39-06-01, 39-06-04,
39-06-14, 39-06-14.1, 39-06-16, 39-06.2-07, 39-08-20, 39-08-23, 39-08-24, 39-08-25, 39-09-01,
39-09-01.1, 39-09-04.1, or 39-09-09, subsection 1 of section 39-12-02, section 39-12-04, 39-12-05,
39-12-06, 39-12-09, 39-19-03, 39-21-45.1, section 3 of this Act, section 39-24-02, or 39-24-09, except
subdivisions b and c of subsection 5 of section 39-24-09, or equivalent ordinances; or a violation of the
provisions of chapter 39-10, 39-10.2, 39-21, or 39-27, or equivalent ordinances, except subsection 5 of
section 39-10-26, section 39-21-44, and subsections 2 and 3 of section 39-21-46, and those sections
within those chapters which are specifically listed in subsection 1 of section 39-06.1-08.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 39-21 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Engine compression brake device - Prohibited - Posting.
1. An operator of a commercial motor vehicle may not use an engine compression brake device
that creates a noise disturbance in a zone posted as prohibiting the use of an engine
compression brake device.
2. Subsection 1 does not apply to the use of an engine compression brake device during an
emergency situation.
3. A city or county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting the use of an engine compression brake
device in a designated zone and may post the prohibition in the designated zone.

S. B. NO. 2253 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2253.
Senate Vote: Yeas 36 Nays 11 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 54 Nays 40 Absent 0
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State